Maryland, session 2026, HB1014.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
10–601.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1014*

HOUSE BILL 1014
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Clinical social worker” means an individual who is licensed under Title 19 of
the Health Occupations Article to practice clinical social work.
(C) “DANGER TO THE LIFE OR SAFETY OF THE INDIVIDUAL OR OF OTHERS”
MEANS THERE IS, AS A RESULT OF A MENTAL DISORDER, A SUBSTANTIAL RISK,
WHETHER OR NOT THE RISK IS IMMINENT BASED ON CONDUCT THAT IS RECENT AND
RELEVANT TO THE DANGER THAT THE INDIVIDUAL MAY PRESENT AND IN
CONSIDERATION OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S CURRENT CONDITION AND, IF AVAILABLE,
RECENT PERSONAL, MEDICAL, AND PSYCHIATRIC HISTORY, THAT AS A RESULT OF
THE MENTAL DISORDER THE INDIVIDUAL WILL:
(1) CAUSE SERIOUS BODILY HARM TO THE INDIVIDUAL OR ANOTHER
INDIVIDUAL; OR
(2) ENGAGE IN CONDUCT THAT WILL RESULT IN CRIMINAL JUSTICE
INVOLVEMENT;
(3) (2) BE UNABLE, EXCEPT FOR REASONS OF INDIGENCE, TO
PROVIDE FOR THE INDIVIDUAL’S BASIC NEEDS, INCLUDING FOOD, CLOTHING,
SHELTER, MEDICAL CARE, SELF–PROTECTION, OR SAFETY, TO SUCH A DEGREE AS
TO CREATE A SUBSTANTIAL RISK OF SERIOUS BODILY HARM, SERIOUS ILLNESS, OR
DEATH IN THE NEAR FUTURE.; OR
(4) SUFFER SUBSTANTIAL DETERIORATION OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S
JUDGMENT, REASONING, OR ABILITY TO CONTROL BEHAVIOR, PROVIDED THAT THE
INDIVIDUAL IS CURRENTLY SUBSTANTIALLY IMPAIRED IN THE INDIVIDUAL’S
ABILITY TO MAKE A RATIONAL AND INFORMED DECISION AS TO WHETHER TO
SUBMIT TO TREATMENT, THAT WILL LIKELY RESULT IN THE INDIVIDUAL MEETING
ONE OF THE CRITERIA ENUMERATED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
[(c)] (D) “Electronic record” means a document communicated, received, or
stored by electronic means.
[(d)] (E) “Licensed clinical marriage and family therapist” means an individual
who is licensed under Title 17, Subtitle 3A of the Health Occupations Article to practice
clinical marriage and family therapy.
[(e)] (F) “Licensed clinical professional counselor” means an individual who is
licensed under Title 17, Subtitle 3A of the Health Occupations Article to practice clinical
professional counseling.

HOUSE BILL 1014 3
[(f)] (G) “Physician” means an individual who is licensed under Title 14 of the
Health Occupations Article to practice medicine in this State.
[(g)] (H) “Psychiatric nurse practitioner” means an individual who is:
(1) Licensed as a registered nurse and certified as a nurse practitioner
under Title 8 of the Health Occupations Article; and
(2) Practicing in the State as a certified registered nurse
practitioner–psychiatric mental health.
[(h)] (I) “Psychologist” means an individual who is licensed under Title 18 of the
Health Occupations Article to practice psychology.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.